Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-709
Electric lines; clearance from other lines.

All lines constructed for the transmission of electric current, including telephone and telegraph lines, on the public highways or in other places in this state, except as provided in section 75-724, shall provide sufficient clearance between such lines and existing properly constructed transmission, telephone, and telegraph lines so that they do not interfere with the reasonable safety, operation, and efficiency of existing lines.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 9, p. 1423;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 121.